District of Columbia statutes.
22-1302

Repealed

Duelling challenges.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1328, ch. 854, § 852
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1639
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(d), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-1102.
1973 Ed., § 22-1102.